Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2805
Property; unpaid taxes; notice to state and political subdivisions.

Prior to advertising for sale, the county treasurer shall notify the state and all political subdivisions which have any interest in taxes or special assessments levied and assessed against such property of the proposed sale and the date of such sale.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 5, p. 1496.